Hawaii statutes.
[§290-22] When vehicle deemed
abandoned. A motor vehicle shall be deemed to be abandoned upon
satisfaction of the following conditions:

(1) The service requested or required by a person
whose vehicle is towed or brought to a motor vehicle repair business, such as
towing and rendering estimates of the cost of repairs has been performed; and

(2) No authorization is given to perform any further
service respecting the vehicle but the vehicle is left on the repair business
premises; and

(3) The owner of the repair business or the owner's
authorized representative has given notice by registered or certified mail to
the legal and registered owner of the motor vehicle at the addresses on record
in the vehicle licensing division stating that, if the vehicle is not
repossessed within thirty days after the mailing of the notice, it will be sold
or disposed of as junk. The notice also shall contain a description of the
vehicle and its location. The notice need not be sent to a legal or registered
owner or any person with an unrecorded interest in the vehicle whose name or
address cannot be determined; and

(4) The vehicle is not repossessed within the above
mentioned thirty-day period. [L 1969, c 178, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next